Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-245
School lands; waste or trespass; penalty.

If any person shall commit waste or trespass, or other injury or damage, or destroy any of the trees upon any of the educational lands of this state referred to in sections 72-201 to 72-251, except as herein authorized, he shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 21, p. 312;

Laws 1909, c. 133, § 2, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 5867;

C.S.1922, § 5203;

C.S.1929, § 72-223;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 16, p. 609;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-223;

R.S.1943, § 72-245;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 178.